Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2 Termination of Entities
4-29-237. Governmental entities terminated on June 30, 2016.

The following governmental entities terminate June 30, 2016:

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2012 amendment; commission terminated.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, commission terminated.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2013 amendment, board terminated, responsibilities transferred to Tennessee board of water quality, oil, and gas, created by § 69-3-104. See § 4-29-235.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Terminated.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-245.]

[Deleted by 2016 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2014 amendment, transferred to § 4-29-236.]

Each department, commission, board, agency, or council of state government created during calendar year 2014 terminates on June 30, 2016.

Any governmental entity that has been terminated under this section may be continued, reestablished, or restructured in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 2009, ch. 8, § 2; 2009, ch. 13, § 2; 2009, ch. 17, § 2; 2009, ch. 21, § 2; 2009, ch. 24, § 2; 2009, ch. 44, § 2; 2009, ch. 92, § 2; 2009, ch. 119, § 2; 2009, ch. 457, § 2; 2010, ch. 667, § 2; 2010, ch. 669, § 2; 2010, ch. 674, § 2; 2010, ch. 681, § 2; 2010, ch. 988, § 2; 2010, ch. 995, § 2; 2010, ch. 996, § 2; 2010, ch. 997, § 2; 2010, ch. 998, § 1; 2010, ch. 1011, § 2; 2011, ch. 14, § 2; 2011, ch. 20, § 2; 2011, ch. 21, § 2; 2011, ch. 22, § 2; 2011, ch. 24, § 2; 2011, ch. 28, § 2; 2011, ch. 29, § 2; 2011, ch. 35, § 2; 2011, ch. 44, § 2; 2011, ch. 66, § 2; 2011 ch. 171, § 2; 2011 ch. 172, § 2; 2011, ch. 173, § 2; 2011, ch. 174, § 2; 2011, ch. 175, § 2; 2011, ch. 183, § 2; 2011, ch. 325, § 2; 2011, ch. 327, § 2; 2011, ch. 442, § 2; 2012, ch. 598, § 2; 2012, ch. 619, § 2, 2012, ch. 622, § 2, 2012, ch. 630, § 2; 2012, ch. 650, § 2; 2012, ch. 699, § 2; 2012, ch. 717, § 2; 2012, ch. 718, § 2; 2012, ch. 719, § 2; 2012, ch. 720, § 2; 2012, ch. 721, § 2; 2012, ch. 722, § 2; 2012, ch. 723, § 2; 2012, ch. 724, § 2; 2012, ch. 776, § 2; 2012 ch. 986, §§ 23, 30, 46; 2012, ch. 1031, § 3; 2013, ch. 76, § 2; 2013, ch. 126, § 3; 2014, ch. 515, § 1; 2014, ch. 526, § 1; 2014, ch. 627, § 1; 2014, ch. 656, § 2; 2014, ch. 667, § 2; 2014, ch. 780, § 2; 2014, ch. 918, § 1; 2014, ch. 964, § 3; 2016, ch. 535, § 1; 2016, ch. 536, § 1; 2016, ch. 537, § 1; 2016, ch. 538, § 1; 2016, ch. 539, § 1; 2016, ch. 540, § 1; 2016, ch. 541, § 1; 2016, ch. 542, § 1; 2016, ch. 543, § 1; 2016, ch. 544, § 1; 2016, ch. 545, § 1; 2016, ch. 546, § 1; 2016, ch. 547, § 1; 2016, ch. 548, § 1; 2016, ch. 549, § 1; 2016, ch. 550, § 1; 2016, ch. 551, § 1; 2016, ch. 552, § 1; 2016, ch. 553, § 1; 2016, ch. 554, § 1; 2016, ch. 555, § 1; 2016, ch. 556, § 1; 2016, ch. 557, § 1; 2016, ch. 558, § 1; 2016, ch. 559, § 1; 2016, ch. 560, § 1; 2016, ch. 561, § 1; 2016, ch. 562, § 1; 2016, ch. 563, § 1; 2016, ch. 564, § 1; 2016, ch. 565, § 1; 2016, ch. 566, § 1; 2016, ch. 567, § 1; 2016, ch. 568, § 1; 2016, ch. 608, § 1; 2016, ch. 609, § 1; 2016, ch. 610, § 1; 2016, ch. 611, § 1; 2016, ch. 612, § 1; 2016, ch. 613, § 1; 2016, ch. 614, § 1; 2016, ch. 615, § 1; 2016, ch. 616, § 1; 2016, ch. 639, § 1; 2016, ch. 761, § 1; 2016, ch. 762, § 1; 2016, ch. 772, § 1; 2016, ch. 773, § 1; 2016, ch. 774, § 1; 2016, ch. 775, § 1; 2016, ch. 776, § 1; 2016, ch. 846, § 1; 2017, ch. 327, § 1; 2017, ch. 444, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.

Acts 2012, ch. 1031, § 4 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112 or any other law to the contrary, the civil service commission, created by §8-30-102, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon April 1, 2013.

The Southern Dairy Compact, created by §43-35-101, terminated June 30, 2016, and is in its wind-up period pursuant to the provisions of §4-29-112. Wind-up was completed June 30, 2017. See §§ 4-29-104,4-29-112.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment by ch. 535 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the advisory board for rehabilitation centers which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2016, ch. 535, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 536 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the archaeological advisory council which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2016, ch. 536, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 537 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of appeals for the department of human resources which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2016, ch. 537, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 538 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of athletic trainers which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2016, ch. 538, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 539 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of land survey examiners which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2016, ch. 539, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 540 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of medical examiners which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2016, ch. 540, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 541 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of respiratory care which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2016, ch. 541, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 542 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the bureau of ethics and campaign finance which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2016, ch. 542, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 543 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the center for earthquake research and information which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2016, ch. 543, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 544 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the commission on aging and disability which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2016, ch. 544, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 545 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the committee for clinical perfusionists which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2016, ch. 545, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 546 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the controlled substance database advisory committee which was transferred to §4-29-239 by Acts 2016, ch. 546, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 547 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the council of certified professional midwifery which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2016, ch. 547, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 548 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Doe Mountain recreation authority which was transferred to §4-29-239 by Acts 2016, ch. 548, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 549 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Douglas Henry state museum commission which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2016, ch. 549, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 550 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the employee suggestion award board which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2016, ch. 550, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 551 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Great Smoky Mountain parks commission which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2016, ch. 551, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 552 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the interstate compact on mental health which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2016, ch. 552, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 553 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the interstate compact on the placement of children which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2016, ch. 553, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 554 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the massage licensure board which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2016, ch. 554, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 555 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Memphis regional megasite authority which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2016, ch. 555, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 556 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the polysomnographic professional standards committee which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2016, ch. 556, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 557 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the public records commission which was transferred to §4-29-245 by Acts 2016, ch. 557, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 558 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the selection panel for TennCare reviewers which was transferred to §4-29-244 by Acts 2016, ch. 558, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 559 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the southeast interstate low-level radioactive waste compact which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2016, ch. 559, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 560 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the state board of accountancy which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2016, ch. 560, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 561 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the state board of cosmetology and barber examiners which was transferred to §4-29-239 by Acts 2016, ch. 561, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 562 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the state election commission which was transferred to §4-29-245 by Acts 2016, ch. 562, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 563 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the state funding board which was transferred to §4-29-245 by Acts 2016, ch. 563, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 564 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the state TennCare pharmacy advisory committee which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2016, ch. 564, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 565 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee medical laboratory board which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2016, ch. 565, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 566 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee sports hall of fame which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2016, ch. 566, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 567 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee-Tombigbee waterway development authority which was transferred to §4-29-245 by Acts 2016, ch. 567, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 568 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the water and wastewater operators, board of certification which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2016, ch. 568, § 2, effective March 2, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 608 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the advisory council on workers' compensation, which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2016, ch. 608, § 2, effective March 22, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 609 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the applied behavior analyst licensing committee of the board of examiners in psychology, which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2016, ch. 609, § 2, effective March 22, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 610 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of examiners for architects and engineers, which were transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2016, ch. 609, § 2, effective March 22, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 611 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of examiners for nursing home administrators, which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2016, ch. 611, § 2, effective March 22, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 612 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the council for hearing instrument specialists, which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2016, ch. 612, § 2, effective March 22, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 613 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the emergency medical services board, which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2016, ch. 613, § 2, effective March 22, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 614 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the state board for alarm contractors, which were transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2016, ch. 614, § 2, effective March 22, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 615 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the state family support council, which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2016, ch. 615, § 2, effective March 22, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 616 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee advisory committee for acupuncture, which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2016, ch. 616, § 2, effective March 22, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 639 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the department of transportation, which were transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2016, ch. 639, § 2, effective March 23, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 761 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the regional transportation authority, which was transferred to §4-29-239 by Acts 2016, ch. 761, § 2, effective April 19, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 762 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee rehabilitative initiative in correction board, which were transferred to §4-29-239 by Acts 2016, ch. 762, § 2, effective April 19, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 772 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of dietitian/nutritionist examiners, which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2016, ch. 772, § 2, effective April 12, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 773 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of pharmacy, which were transferred to §4-29-239 by Acts 2016, ch. 773, § 2, effective April 12, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 774 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the department of human resources, which were transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2016, ch. 774, § 2, effective April 12, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 775 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the state soil conservation committee, which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2016, ch. 775, § 2, effective April 12, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 776 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee motor vehicle commission, which were transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2016, ch. 776, § 2, effective April 12, 2016.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 846 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the department of finance and administration which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2016, ch. 846, § 2, effective April 12, 2016.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 327 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board for licensing healthcare facilities, which were transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2017, ch. 327, § 2, effective May 9, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 444 deleted former provisions of (a) concerning the Tennessee medical examiner advisory council, which were transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 201, ch. 444, § 2, effective July 1, 2017.

4-29-238. Governmental entities terminated on June 30, 2017.

The following governmental entities terminate on June 30, 2017:

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-239.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-246.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-241.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2018 amendment, committee terminated.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-244.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-243.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-242.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-240.]

[Deleted by 2017 amendment; transferred to § 4-29-240.]

Each department, commission, board, agency, or council of state government created during calendar year 2015 terminates on June 30, 2017.

Any governmental entity that has been terminated under this section may be continued, reestablished, or restructured in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 2009, ch. 12, § 2; 2009, ch. 118, § 2; 2009, ch. 120, § 2; 2009, ch. 122, § 2; 2009, ch. 126, § 2; 2009, ch. 130, § 2; 2009, ch. 133, § 2; 2009, ch. 139, § 2; 2010, ch. 668, § 2; 2011, ch. 23, § 2; 2012, ch. 521, § 2; 2012, ch. 522, § 2; 2012, ch. 523, § 2; 2012, ch. 524, § 2; 2012, ch. 525, § 2; 2012, ch. 526, § 2; 2012, ch. 527, § 2; 2012, ch. 528, § 2; 2012, ch. 529, § 2; 2012, ch. 550, § 2; 2012, ch. 586, § 2; 2012, ch. 620, § 2; 2012, ch. 809, § 2; 2012, ch. 989, § 2; 2013, ch. 13, § 2; 2013, ch. 20, § 2; 2013, ch. 38, § 2; 2013, ch. 39, § 2; 2013, ch. 40, § 2; 2013, ch. 41, § 2; 2013, ch. 42, § 2; 2013, ch. 43, § 2; 2013, ch. 44, § 2; 2013, ch. 45, § 2; 2013, ch. 55, § 2; 2013, ch. 79, § 2; 2013, ch. 83, § 2; 2013, ch. 87, § 2; 2013, ch. 128, § 2; 2013, ch. 130, § 2; 2013, ch. 131, § 2; 2013, ch. 134, § 2; 2013, ch. 252, § 2; 2013, ch. 332, § 2; 2014, ch. 525, § 2; 2014, ch. 680, § 2; 2014, ch. 773, § 2; 2014, ch. 776, § 2; 2014, ch. 777, § 2; 2014, ch. 945, § 2; 2014, ch. 946, § 2; 2014, ch. 981, § 2; 2015, ch. 65, § 2; 2015, ch. 163, § 2; 2015, ch. 350, § 2; 2015, ch. 351, § 2; 2015, ch. 488, § 9; 2016, ch. 528, § 16; 2016, ch. 597, § 1; 2017, ch. 2, § 1; 2017, ch. 37, § 1; 2017, ch. 38, § 1; 2017, ch. 39, § 1; 2017, ch. 40, § 1; 2017, ch. 41, § 1; 2017, ch. 42, § 1; 2017, ch. 43, § 1; 2017, ch. 44, § 1; 2017, ch. 45, § 1; 2017, ch. 46, § 1; 2017, ch. 47, § 1; 2017, ch. 48, § 1; 2017, ch. 49, § 1; 2017, ch. 50, § 1; 2017, ch. 51, § 1; 2017, ch. 52, § 1; 2017, ch. 53, § 1; 2017, ch. 54, § 1; 2017, ch. 55, § 1; 2017, ch. 56, § 1; 2017, ch. 57, § 1; 2017, ch. 58, § 1; 2017, ch. 59, § 1; 2017, ch. 60, § 1; 2017, ch. 61, § 1; 2017, ch. 62, § 1; 2017, ch. 63, § 1; 2017, ch. 64, § 1; 2017, ch. 65, § 1; 2017, ch. 66, § 1; 2017, ch. 67, § 1; 2017, ch. 68, § 1; 2017, ch. 69, § 1; 2017, ch. 70, § 1; 2017, ch. 71, § 1; 2017, ch. 72, § 1; 2017, ch. 73, § 1; 2017, ch. 74, § 1; 2017, ch. 75, § 1; 2017, ch. 76, § 1; 2017, ch. 77, § 1; 2017, ch. 78, § 1; 2017, ch. 115, § 1; 2017, ch. 116, § 1; 2017, ch. 117, § 1; 2017, ch. 315, § 1; 2017, ch. 316, § 1; 2017, ch. 317, § 1; 2017, ch. 318, § 1; 2017, ch. 319, § 1; 2017, ch. 320, § 1; 2017, ch. 321, § 1; 2017, ch. 322, § 1; 2017, ch. 323, § 1; 2017, ch. 324, § 1; 2017, ch. 435, § 1; 2017, ch. 473, § 1; 2018, ch. 968, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

Acts 2017, ch. 65, § 4 provided that notwithstanding §4-29-112, the state trust of Tennessee, created by §9-4-801 shall terminate and shall cease to exist March 31, 2017.

The Tennessee health information committee created by §56-2-125, terminated June 30, 2017, and is in its wind-up period pursuant to the provisions of §4-29-112. Wind-up will be completed June 30, 2018. See §§4-29-104,4-29-112.

Amendments. The 2014 amendment by ch. 981 effective January 1, 2015, added “state textbook and instructional materials quality commission, created by §49-6-2201;” in (a).

The 2015 amendment by ch. 65 added “Tennessee health information committee, created by §56-2-125;” in (a).

The 2015 amendment by ch. 163 added “consumer advocate division in the office of the attorney general and reporter, created by §65-4-118;” in (a).

The 2015 amendment by ch. 350 added “emergency communications board, created by §7-86-302;” in (a).

The 2015 amendment by ch. 351 added “Tennessee athletic commission, created by §68-115-103;” in (a).

The 2015 amendment by ch. 488 added “underground utility damage enforcement board, created by §65-31-114.

The 2016 amendment by ch. 528 added “trial court vacancy commission, created by §17-4-301;” in (a).

The 2016 amendment by ch. 597 added “private probation services council, created by §16-3-901” in (a).

The 2017 amendment by ch. 2 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee emergency management agency, which were transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2017, ch. 2, § 2, effective March 15, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 37 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the advisory council on state procurement, which were transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2017, ch. 37, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 38 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of chiropractic examiners, which were transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 38, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 39 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of communication disorders and sciences, which were transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 39, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 40 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of dentistry, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 40, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 41 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of examiners in psychology, which were transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 41, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 42 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of medical examiners' committee on physician assistants, which were transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 42, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 43 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of optometry, which were transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 43, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 44 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of veterinary medical examiners, which were transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 44, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 45 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the civil defense and disaster compact, which were transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2017, ch. 45, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 46 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the consumer advocate division in the office of the attorney general and reporter, which were transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 46, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 47 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the committee for purchase from the blind and other severely disabled, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 47, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 48 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the council on pensions and insurance, created by §3-9-101;, which was transferred to §4-29-246 by Acts 2017, ch. 48, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 49 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the department of financial institutions, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 49, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 50 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the department of general services, which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2017, ch. 50, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 51 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the department of mental health and substance abuse services, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 51, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 52 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the emergency communications board, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 52, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 53 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the emergency management assistance compact, which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2017, ch. 53, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 54 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the interstate compact on detainers, which was transferred to §4-29-246 by Acts 2017, ch. 54, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 55 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the interstate corrections compact, which was transferred to §4-29-246 by Acts 2017, ch. 55, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 56 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the interstate earthquake compact of 1988, which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2017, ch. 56, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 57 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the interstate insurance product regulation compact of 2007, which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2017, ch. 57, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 58 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the local government insurance committee, which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2017, ch. 58, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 59 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the southeastern interstate forest fire protection compact, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 59, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 60 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the state building commission, which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2017, ch. 60, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 61 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the state capitol commission, which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2017, ch. 61, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 62 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the state insurance committee, which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2017, ch. 62, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 63 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the state procurement commission, which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2017, ch. 63, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 64 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the state protest committee, which was transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2017, ch. 64, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 65 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the state trust of Tennessee.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 66 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the statewide community services agency, which was transferred to §4-29-239 by Acts 2017, ch. 66, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 67 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the statewide planning and policy council for the department of intellectual and developmental disabilities, which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2017, ch. 67, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 68 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the statewide planning and policy council for the department of mental health and substance abuse services, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 68, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 69 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee arts commission, which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2017, ch. 69, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 70 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee athletic commission, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 70, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 71 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee code commission, which was transferred to §4-29-246 by Acts 2017, ch. 71, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 72 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee community resource board, which was transferred to §4-29-246 by Acts 2017, ch. 72, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 73 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee financial literacy commission, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 73, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 74 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee life and health insurance guaranty association, which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2017, ch. 74, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 75 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee public utility commission, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 75, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 76 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee residence commission, which was transferred to §4-29-243 by Acts 2017, ch. 76, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 77 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee technology development corporation, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 77, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 78 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the trial court vacancy commission, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2017, ch. 78, § 2, effective March 31, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 115 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the state forestry commission, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 115, § 2, effective April 12, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 116 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations, which was transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 116, § 2, effective April 12, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 117 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the underground utility damage enforcement board, which was transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2017, ch. 117, § 2, effective April 12, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 315 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the alcoholic beverage commission, which were transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 315, § 2, effective May 9, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 316 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the board of podiatric medical examiners, which were transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 316, § 2, effective May 9, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 317 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the department of economic and community development, which were transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 317, § 2, effective May 9, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 318 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the department of safety, which were transferred to §4-29-241 by Acts 2017, ch. 318, § 2, effective May 9, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 319 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the human rights commission, which were transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 319, § 2, effective May 9, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 320 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the private probation services council, which were transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2017, ch. 320, § 2, effective May 9, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 321 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the second look commission, which were transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 321, § 2, effective May 9, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 322 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the state textbook and instructional materials quality commission, which were transferred to §4-29-240 by Acts 2017, ch. 322, § 2, effective May 9, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 323 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee council for career and technical education, which were transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 323, § 2, effective May 9, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 324 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee interagency cash flow committee, which were transferred to §4-29-244 by Acts 2017, ch. 324, § 2, effective May 9, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 435 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the department of children's services, which were transferred to §4-29-242 by Acts 2017, ch. 435, § 2, effective May 14, 2017.

The 2017 amendment by ch. 473 deleted former provisions of (a) concerning the health services and development agency, which were transferred to §4-29-239 by Acts 2017, ch. 473, § 2, effective June 6, 2017.

The 2018 amendment, by ch. 968 deleted the former provisions in (a) concerning the Tennessee health information committee, created by §56-2-125, effective May 16, 2018.